Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.040

Scrap metal businesses—Record of commercial accounts. (Effective until April 1, 2025.)

(1) Every scrap metal business must create and maintain a permanent record with a commercial enterprise, including another scrap metal business, in order to establish a commercial account. That record, at a minimum, must include the following information:

(a) The full name of the commercial enterprise or commercial account;

(b) The business address and telephone number of the commercial enterprise or commercial account; and

(c) The full name of the person employed by the commercial enterprise who is authorized to deliver private metal property, nonferrous metal property, and commercial metal property to the scrap metal business.

(2) The record maintained by a scrap metal business for a commercial account must document every purchase or receipt of private metal property, nonferrous metal property, and commercial metal property from the commercial enterprise. The record must be maintained for three years following the date of the transfer or receipt. The documentation must include, at a minimum, the following information:

(a) The time, date, and value of the property being purchased or received;

(b) A description of the predominant types of property being purchased or received; and

(c) The signature of the person delivering the property to the scrap metal business.

[ 2013 c 322 s 7; 2008 c 233 s 4; 2007 c 377 s 4.]

PDFRCW 19.290.040

Scrap metal businesses—Record of commercial accounts. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

(1) Every scrap metal business must create and maintain a permanent record with a commercial enterprise, including another scrap metal business, in order to establish a commercial account. That record, at a minimum, must include the following information:

(a) The full name of the commercial enterprise or commercial account;

(b) The business address and telephone number of the commercial enterprise or commercial account; and

(c) The full name of the person employed by the commercial enterprise who is authorized to deliver nonferrous metal property and commercial metal property to the scrap metal business.

(2) The record maintained by a scrap metal business for a commercial account must document every purchase or receipt of nonferrous metal property and commercial metal property from the commercial enterprise. The record must be maintained for three years following the date of the transfer or receipt. The documentation must include, at a minimum, the following information:

(a) The time, date, and value of the property being purchased or received;

(b) A description of the predominant types of property being purchased or received; and

(c) The signature of the person delivering the property to the scrap metal business.

[ 2024 c 301 s 6; 2013 c 322 s 7; 2008 c 233 s 4; 2007 c 377 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.